electron_app/dictionaries/pt_BR.aff
SFX L Y 77
SFX L   0               -lhe            .
SFX L   0               -lho            .
SFX L   0               -lha            .
SFX L   0               -lhes           .
SFX L   0               -lhos           .
SFX L   0               -lhas           .
SFX L   0               -lhe-ei         r
SFX L   0               -lhe-eis        r
SFX L   0               -lhe-emos       r
SFX L   0               -lhe-á          r
SFX L   0               -lhe-ás         r
SFX L   0               -lhe-ão         r
SFX L   0               -lhe-iam        r
SFX L   0               -lhe-íamos      r
SFX L   0               -lhe-ia         r
SFX L   0               -lhe-ias        r
SFX L   0               -lhes-ei        r
SFX L   0               -lhes-eis       r
SFX L   0               -lhes-emos      r
SFX L   0               -lhes-á         r
SFX L   0               -lhes-ás        r
SFX L   0               -lhes-ão        r
SFX L   0               -lhes-iam       r
SFX L   0               -lhes-íamos     r
SFX L   0               -lhes-ia        r
SFX L   0               -lhes-ias       r
SFX L   0               -me             .
SFX L   0               -te             .
SFX L   0               -se             .
SFX L   ns              m-nos           ns
SFX L   s               -nos            mos
SFX L   0               -nos            [^náo]s
SFX L   0               -nos            [^sá]
SFX L   0               -vos            .
SFX L   0               -me-ei          r
SFX L   0               -me-eis         r
SFX L   0               -me-emos        r
SFX L   0               -me-á           r
SFX L   0               -me-ás          r
SFX L   0               -me-ão          r
SFX L   0               -me-iam         r
SFX L   0               -me-íamos       r
SFX L   0               -me-ia          r
SFX L   0               -me-ias         r
SFX L   0               -te-ei          r
SFX L   0               -te-emos        r
SFX L   0               -te-á           r
SFX L   0               -te-ás          r
SFX L   0               -te-ão          r
SFX L   0               -te-ias         r
SFX L   0               -te-iam         r
SFX L   0               -te-íamos       r
SFX L   0               -te-ia          r
SFX L   0               -nos-emos       r
SFX L   0               -nos-eis        r
SFX L   0               -nos-á          r
SFX L   0               -nos-ás         r
SFX L   0               -nos-ão         r
SFX L   0               -nos-íamos      r
SFX L   0               -nos-iam        r
SFX L   0               -nos-ia         r
SFX L   0               -nos-ias        r
SFX L   0               -se-ia          r
SFX L   0               -se-ão          r
SFX L   0               -se-iam         r
SFX L   0               -se-á           r
SFX L   0               -vos-eis        r
SFX L   0               -vos-emos       r
SFX L   0               -vos-á          r
SFX L   0               -vos-ei         r
SFX L   0               -vos-ás         r
SFX L   0               -vos-ão         r
SFX L   0               -vos-íeis       r
SFX L   0               -vos-íamos      r
SFX L   0               -vos-iam        r
SFX L   0               -vos-ia         r
SFX L   0               -vos-ias        r
